Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF1562.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION; RAMSEY COUNTY; GIBBS FARM MUSEUM: PATHWAYS TO DAKOTA AND PIONEER LIFE.new text end new text begin $500,000 in fiscal year 2026 is appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of employment and economic development for a grant to the Ramsey County Historical Society to design, renovate, construct, furnish, and equip site improvements, buildings, and facilities at Gibbs Farm, a museum dedicated to the history of early Minnesota agriculture and the relationship between the Dakota people of Heyata Othunwe and the Jane and Heman Gibbs family. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end